District of Columbia statutes.
50-2206.35

Harbor Master public awareness campaign.

The Harbor Master shall be directly responsible for enforcing this part and shall ensure that the public is made aware of the District’s aggressive enforcement policy through a continual public awareness campaign.

History

Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-145, § 3n
as added Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 103(e)(3), 59 DCR 12957

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-266 added this section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 103(e)(3) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 103(e)(3) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).